Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1815
Jurisdictional utility; reports; failure to file; penalty.

(1) Every jurisdictional utility shall file with the commission an annual report and such monthly or other regular reports, or special reports, and such other information as the commission may require.

(2) Any jurisdictional utility which fails, neglects, or refuses to file with the commission any annual reports, statements, monthly or regular reports, or special reports required by the commission pursuant to the State Natural Gas Regulation Act or rules and regulations of the commission shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than five hundred dollars.

Laws 2003, LB 790, § 15.